Final_code/dictionary.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="verb"/>
    <sdef n="singular"/>
    <sdef n="plural"/>
    <sdef n="feminine"/>
    <sdef n="masculine"/>
    <sdef n="present"/>
	<sdef n="past"/>
	<sdef n="future"/>
	<sdef n="perfect"/>
	<sdef n="1st person"/>
	<sdef n="2nd person"/>
	<sdef n="3rd person"/>
	<sdef n="imperative"/>
	<sdef n="habitual"/>
	<sdef n="intimate"/>
	<sdef n="semi-honorable"/>
	<sdef n="honorable"/>
	<sdef n="infinitive"/>
	<sdef n="subjunctive"/>
	<sdef n="conjunctive"/>
	<sdef n="first causative"/>
	<sdef n="second causative"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  <pardef n="k/ara__n">
			<e><p>
		<l>ara</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>ara</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>iyA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arawA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arawI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aranA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aranA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arawe</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>arawIm</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aranI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aregA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aregA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aregI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>areMgI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aroge</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arogI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>areMge</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aro</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>arie</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="present"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aravA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>karavAo</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>ie</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="subjunctive"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arane</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>ariegA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAnA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAIegA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arUz</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>areM</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arUzgA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>arUzgI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>areMge</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAyA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAwI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAegA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAegI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAUzgA</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAUzgI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAezge</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aravAezgI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAne</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAwa</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aravAwI</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aravAwe</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aravAwIM</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>I</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>aravAo</l>
			<r>ara<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
  </pardef>

	<e lm="kara"><i>k</i><par n="k/ara__n"/></e>
